Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1144.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 2.08.063 and 2024 c 112 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:There shall be in the county of Lincoln one judge of the superior court; in the county of Skagit, ((four))five judges of the superior court; in the county of Walla Walla, two judges of the superior court; in the county of Whitman, one judge of the superior court; in the county of Yakima, eight judges of the superior court; in the county of Adams, one judge of the superior court; in the county of Whatcom, five judges of the superior court.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2025, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.--- END ---